District of Columbia statutes.
38-271.03

Annual evaluation of the quality of current pre-k programs.

(a)

Within 30 days of July 18, 2008, the Mayor shall submit to the Council for its approval, a plan, including the name of a proposed independent evaluator, to evaluate pre-k programs in accordance with this section. Within 60 days of Council approval, the Mayor shall execute a contract with the approved evaluator.

(b)

The approved evaluator shall perform a baseline quality assessment for a sampling of pre-k classrooms in each of the following sectors:

(1)

District of Columbia Public Schools;

(2)

Public charter schools; and

(3)

CBOs.

(c)

The evaluator shall collect baseline quality data to:

(1)

Describe the overall program structure;

(2)

Assess the language and literacy environment; and

(3)

Assess the quality of instructional support, classroom climate, and classroom management.

(d)

The evaluator’s data and analysis shall be used to:

(1)

Provide an assessment of the level of quality of all sectors; and

(2)

Serve as baseline data from which to develop benchmarks for ongoing quality assessment of the pre-k-education system.

(e)

The Mayor shall submit to the Council by September 15 of each year, beginning in 2009, projected benchmarks by which to measure annual achievements within the pre-k-education system.

History

July 18, 2008, D.C. Law 17-202, § 103, 55 DCR 6297

Section References

This section is referenced in § 38-271.05.